New Jersey, session 222, A1935.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1973, c.82 (C.19:53A-1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in this act, unless otherwise specified: a.    "Automatic tabulating equipment"  includes apparatus which automatically examines and counts votes recorded on ballot cards, and tabulates  the results. b.    "Ballot card" means a tabulating card on which votes may be recorded. c.    "Ballot labels"  means the pages, cards, or other material containing the names of offices and candidates and the statements of measures to be voted on, which are placed on the voting device. d.    "Counting center"  means one or more locations selected by each of the  county boards of election for the automatic counting of ballots. e.    "Electronic voting system"  means a system in which votes are recorded  on ballot cards, and such votes are subsequently counted and tabulated by  automatic tabulating equipment at one or more counting centers. f.     Electronic voting system vendor  means and includes any individual, firm, joint venture, partnership, corporation, or company seeking certification for electronic voting systems in this State. [f] g.    "Voting device"  means an apparatus which the voter uses to record his  votes on a tabulating card. [g] h.   "County boards of elections"  shall mean the county board of elections  appointed in the various counties or the person or board in charge of elections  in the various counties as provided in Title 19 of the New Jersey Revised  Statutes. (cf: P.L.1973, c.82, s.1) 2.    (New section)    No electronic voting system shall be used in an election in this State unless the electronic voting system vendor discloses any owners or shareholders with a five percent or greater interest or share in the company, in any subsidiary companies, or in the vendors parent company, as well as any changes thereto of five percent or greater,  and has been approved by the Secretary of State. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.